Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 1 Adult Protection
71-6-121. Posting of contact information on adult protective service.

All offices of physicians licensed pursuant to title 63, chapter 6 or 9, all health care facilities licensed pursuant to title 68, chapter 11, all senior centers, all community centers and all pharmacies shall post the following in the main public entrance:

Contact information including the statewide toll-free number of the division of adult protective services, and the number for the local district attorney general's office; and

A statement that a person of advanced age who may be the victim of abuse, neglect, or exploitation may seek assistance or file a complaint with the division concerning abuse, neglect, and exploitation.

The information listed in subsection (a) shall be posted on a sign no smaller than eleven inches (11") in width and seventeen inches (17") in height.

All nursing homes, assisted living facilities and any other residential facility licensed by the board of licensing health care facilities shall upon admission provide to each resident the division of adult protective services' statewide toll-free number.

Any licensed nursing home that complies with the requirements of § 68-11-254 shall be exempt from the requirements of subsections (a) and (b).

All offices of physicians licensed pursuant to title 63, chapter 6 or 9, all health care facilities licensed pursuant to title 68, chapter 11, all community centers, and all pharmacies shall post in the main public entrance, on a sign no smaller than eight and one-half inches (8 ½") in width and eleven inches (11") in height, a statement that any person, regardless of age, who may be the victim of domestic violence may call the nationwide domestic violence hotline, or any other hotline that may be determined by the departments of health and commerce and insurance and communicated to health care providers subject to this section pursuant to subdivision (e)(2), with that number printed in boldface type, for immediate assistance.

The departments of health and commerce and insurance, through the various regulatory and licensure boards with oversight of health care providers, shall include a statement notifying providers of the requirements of subdivision (e)(1) in the newsletters or other routine correspondences of such boards and shall post a copy of such statement on the departments' websites. The statement shall include a contact telephone number for providers to request that a copy of the statement be mailed to them. Upon initial licensure, the various boards shall also provide initial licensees with the statement along with instructions for compliance with subdivision (e)(1).

All offices of physicians licensed pursuant to title 63, chapter 6 or 9, all health care facilities licensed pursuant to title 68, chapter 11, all community centers, and all pharmacies shall post on a sign no smaller than eight and one-half inches (8 ½") in width and eleven inches (11") in height in the main public entrance a statement that a teen involved in a relationship that includes dating violence may call a national toll-free hotline, with that number printed in boldface type, for immediate assistance.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a)-(f) regarding the size of the posters, physicians' offices, health care facilities, community centers and pharmacies are authorized to incorporate all of the information required in subsections (a)-(f) in a single poster at least eight and one-half inches (8 ½") in width and fourteen inches (14") in height that shall be posted in the main public entrance.

The departments of health and commerce and insurance, through the various regulatory and licensure boards with oversight of health care providers, shall include a statement notifying providers of the requirements of subsections (a)-(g) in the newsletters or other routine correspondences of those boards and shall post a copy of the statement on the departments' websites. The statement shall include a contact telephone number for providers to request that a copy of the statement be mailed to them. Upon initial licensure, the various boards shall also provide initial licensees with the statement along with instructions for compliance with subsections (a)-(g).

Acts 2004, ch. 780, § 6; 2006, ch. 804, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 446, §§ 1, 2.

71-6-122. Toll-free number for reporting elder abuse, neglect or exploitation.

The division of adult protective services of the department of human services shall establish a toll-free telephone service to enable citizens within the state to call the division free of charge to report abuse, neglect, or exploitation and to seek relevant assistance from the division in such matters.

Acts 2004, ch. 780, § 7.

Cross-References. Center on Aging — Victimization prevention program, §49-8-802.

71-6-123. Reporting false accusations — Penalties — Investigation.

It is an offense for a person to report to the department an accusation of abuse, sexual abuse, neglect or exploitation of an adult if, at the time of the report, the person knows or should know the accusation is false.

It is an offense for a person to knowingly cause another to report to the department an accusation of abuse, sexual abuse, neglect or exploitation of an adult if, at the time of the conduct, the person knows or should know the accusation is false.

A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding § 71-6-118 to the contrary:

The department may report to the district attorney general or law enforcement authorities the identity of any person whom it reasonably believes has violated this section; and

The information such person reported or caused to be reported may be disclosed and utilized in any manner necessary by the department, the district attorney general or law enforcement authorities as part of any investigation or prosecution of a violation of this section.

Acts 2008, ch. 1005, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-6-124. Order of protection for adult who has been subjected to abuse, neglect, or exploitation.

Any relative, conservator, or agent of the Tennessee commission on aging and disability; designated agency or assign of the relative, conservator, or commission; or attorney ad litem having personal knowledge that an adult has been the subject of a violation of § 39-15-502, § 39-15-507, § 39-15-508, § 39-15-510, § 39-15-511, or § 39-15-512, or that such adult is threatened with or placed in fear of a violation of any of those sections, may seek relief for the adult pursuant to this section by filing a sworn petition with any court having jurisdiction under this part alleging that the respondent has violated or threatens to violate § 39-15-502, § 39-15-507, § 39-15-508, § 39-15-510, § 39-15-511, or § 39-15-512, regardless of the existence of any other remedy at law.

The petition must allege facts, based upon personal knowledge of the petitioner, that the adult either lacks the capacity to consent or that appearing in court to petition on the adult's own behalf would pose an undue burden on the adult.

An elderly or vulnerable adult, who has been the subject of a violation of § 39-15-502, § 39-15-507, § 39-15-508, § 39-15-510, § 39-15-511, or § 39-15-512, or has been threatened with or placed in fear of a violation of any of those sections, may seek relief pursuant to this section by filing a sworn petition with any court having jurisdiction under this part alleging that the respondent has violated or threatens to violate § 39-15-502, § 39-15-507, § 39-15-508, § 39-15-510, § 39-15-511, or § 39-15-512, regardless of the existence of any other remedy at law.

Notwithstanding subdivisions (a)(1)(A) and (C), and for good cause shown, the court may issue an ex parte order of protection pursuant to this section upon a sworn petition filed by a law enforcement officer responding to an incident involving an elderly or vulnerable adult victim who asserts in the petition reasonable grounds to believe that the adult is in immediate and present danger of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or sexual exploitation as defined in § 39-15-501, and that the adult either has consented to the filing or lacks the capacity to consent; provided, that the person on whose behalf the law enforcement officer seeks the ex parte order of protection is considered the petitioner for purposes of this section. The court may waive any court costs, taxes, or fees for obtaining an order of protection upon a finding that the individual for whose benefit an order of protection has been sought is indigent. If a third party seeking an order of protection represents to the court under oath that the individual for whose benefit the order of protection has been sought is indigent, the court will presume that the individual for whose benefit the order of protection has been sought is indigent absent clear and convincing evidence to the contrary.

The law enforcement officer may seek on behalf of the adult the ex parte order regardless of the time of day and regardless of whether an arrest has been made.

If an ex parte order is issued pursuant to this section outside of the court's normal operating hours, the law enforcement officer, judge, or judicial official shall cause the petition and order to be filed with the court as soon as practicable after issuance, but no later than two (2) business days after issuance; and

Law enforcement officers shall not be subject to civil liability under this section for failure to file a petition or for any statement made or act performed in filing the petition, if done in good faith.

Venue for a petition for an order of protection, and all other matters relating to orders of protection, is in the county where the respondent resides or the county in which the violation of § 39-15-502, § 39-15-507, § 39-15-508, § 39-15-510, § 39-15-511, or § 39-15-512 occurred or is threatened to occur. If the respondent is not a resident of this state, the petition may be filed in the county where the adult resides.

Pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A), the court may enter an immediate ex parte order of protection against the respondent if the petition alleges upon personal knowledge of the petitioner, and the court finds in its ex parte order, that the adult lacks capacity to consent or that the adult lacks the ability to be present to petition on their own behalf and is in immediate danger of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or sexual exploitation.

Pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(C), the court may enter an immediate ex parte order of protection against the respondent if the court finds in its ex parte order that the elderly adult is in immediate danger of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or sexual exploitation.

Pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(D), the court may enter an immediate ex parte order of protection against the respondent if the court finds in its ex parte order that the elderly adult is in immediate and present danger of abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, or sexual exploitation, and that the adult has either consented to the filing or lacks the capacity to consent.

The petition and any ex parte order issued pursuant to this section shall be personally served upon the respondent, and if filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) or (a)(1)(D), upon the adult. If the respondent is not a resident of this state, the ex parte order must be served pursuant to §§ 20-2-215 and 20-2-216.

The clerk of the court shall send written notice of the filing of the petition and copies of the petition and the ex parte order of protection against the respondent, if any, to the adult protective services unit of the department of human services in the county where the petition is filed. The department is not responsible for court costs, costs of representation, or costs for a guardian ad litem related to a petition for an ex parte order of protection, or any ex parte order of protection issued pursuant to this section. The department has a right to intervene in the proceeding, but is not otherwise required to initiate any legal action as a result of such notice. The department may, at any time, file a petition pursuant to § 71-6-107 if the department determines the adult who is the subject of a petition for an order of protection is in need of protective services.

Within fifteen (15) days of service of an ex parte order of protection against the respondent, a hearing must be held, at which time the court shall either dissolve any ex parte order that has been issued, or shall, if the petitioner has proven the allegations made pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A), (a)(1)(C), or (a)(1)(D), by a preponderance of the evidence, extend the order of protection for a definite period of time, not to exceed one (1) year, unless a further hearing on the continuation of such order is requested by the adult, the respondent, or the petitioner; in which case, on proper showing of cause, such order may be continued for a further definite period of one (1) year.

Any ex parte order of protection shall be in effect until the time of the hearing and, if the hearing is held within fifteen (15) days of service of such order, the ex parte order continues in effect until the entry of any subsequent order of protection, proceedings under title 34, chapters 1-3, are concluded, or the order of protection is dissolved. If no ex parte order of protection has been issued as of the time of the hearing, and the petitioner has proven the allegations made pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A), (a)(1)(C), or (a)(1)(D) by a preponderance of the evidence, the court may, at that time, issue an order of protection for a definite period of time, not to exceed one (1) year.

The court shall cause a copy of the petition and notice of the date set for the hearing on such petition, as well as a copy of any ex parte order of protection, to be served upon the respondent, and if filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) or (a)(1)(D), upon the adult at least three (3) days prior to such hearing. Such notice shall advise the respondent and the adult that each may be represented by counsel. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem under § 34-1-107.

Within the time the order of protection is in effect, any court with jurisdiction under this part may modify the order of protection, either upon the court's own motion or upon motion of the adult, the respondent, or the petitioner.

An order of protection granted pursuant to this section may:

Order the respondent to refrain from committing a violation of this part or title 39, chapter 15, part 5 against an adult;

Order the respondent to refrain from threatening to misappropriate or further misappropriating any moneys, state or federal benefits, retirement funds, or any other personal or real property belonging to the adult;

Order the return to the adult, the adult's caretaker, conservator, or other fiduciary any moneys, state or federal benefits, retirement funds, or any other personal or real property belonging to the adult obtained by the respondent as a result of exploitation of the adult or as a result of any other misappropriation of such funds or property of the adult by the respondent. The court may enter judgment against the respondent for the repayment or return to the adult or the adult's caretaker, conservator, or other fiduciary of any moneys, government benefits, retirement funds, or any other personal or real property belonging to the adult that are under the control of or that have been obtained by the respondent as a result of exploitation or misappropriation from the adult. This subdivision (b)(3) does not preclude an action under § 71-6-120. The court may, if the amount in question exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), require any caretaker or custodian of funds appointed under this section to post a bond as required by § 34-1-105;

Enjoin the respondent from providing care for an adult, or working in any situation involving the care of an adult, whether such action occurs in an institutional setting, in any type of group home or foster care arrangement serving adults, and regardless of whether such person, facility, or arrangement serving adults is licensed to provide care for adults;

Prohibit the respondent from telephoning, contacting, or otherwise communicating with the adult, directly or indirectly; and

Subject to the limitations otherwise stated in this section, grant any other relief deemed necessary by the court to protect an adult.

All orders of protection shall be effective for a fixed period of time, not to exceed one (1) year. The court may modify its order at any time upon subsequent motion filed by any party together with an affidavit showing a change in circumstances sufficient to warrant the modification. The petitioner, respondent, adult, or the court on its own motion may commence a proceeding under title 34, chapters 1-3 to determine whether a fiduciary or conservator should be appointed, if any party alleges that the conditions giving rise to the order of protection continue or may continue beyond the one (1) year.

If the respondent and the adult have been served with a copy of the petition filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) or (a)(1)(D) and notice of hearing, the order of protection is effective when the order is entered. For purposes of this subdivision (d)(1), an order is considered entered once a hearing is conducted and such order is signed by:

The judge and all parties or counsel;

The judge and one (1) party or counsel and the order contains a certificate of counsel that a copy of the proposed order has been served on all other parties or counsel; or

The judge and the order contains a certificate of the clerk that a copy has been served on all other parties or counsel.

Service upon a party or counsel must be made by delivering to such party or counsel a copy of the order of protection, or by the clerk mailing it to the party's last known address. In the event the party's last known address is unknown and cannot be ascertained upon diligent inquiry, the certificate of service must so state. Service by mail is complete upon mailing.

If the respondent and the adult have been served with a copy of the petition filed pursuant to subdivision (a)(1)(A) or (a)(1)(D) and notice of hearing, an order of protection issued pursuant to this part after a hearing shall be in full force and effect against the respondent from the time it is entered, regardless of whether the respondent is present at the hearing.

A copy of any order of protection and any subsequent modifications or dismissal must be issued by the clerk of the court to the petitioner, the respondent, and the local law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction in the area where the adult resides. Upon receipt of the copy of the order of protection or dismissal from the issuing court or clerk's office, the local law enforcement agency shall take any necessary action to immediately transmit it to the national crime information center.

Upon violation of an order of protection entered pursuant to this section, a court may order any appropriate punishment or relief as provided for in § 36-3-610.

It is an offense to knowingly violate an order of protection issued pursuant to this section. A law enforcement officer may arrest a respondent who is the subject of an order of protection issued pursuant to this section with or without warrant.

In order to constitute a violation of this section:

The person must have received notice of the request for an order of protection;

The person must have had an opportunity to appear and be heard in connection with the order of protection or restraining order; and

The court must have made specific findings of fact in the order of protection that the person committed a violation of this part.

Any law enforcement officer shall arrest the respondent without a warrant if:

The officer has proper jurisdiction over the area in which the violation occurred;

The officer has reasonable cause to believe the respondent has violated or is in violation of an order of protection; and

The officer has verified that an order of protection is in effect against the respondent. If necessary, the law enforcement officer may verify the existence of an order of protection by telephone or radio communication with the appropriate law enforcement department.

Any person arrested for a violation of an order of protection entered pursuant to this section shall be treated as a person arrested for a violation of an order of protection issued pursuant to title 36, chapter 3, part 6.

A violation of this subsection (e) is a Class A misdemeanor, and any sentence imposed is to be served consecutively to the sentence for any other offense that is based in whole or in part on the same factual allegations, unless the sentencing judge or magistrate specifically orders the sentences for the offenses arising out of the same facts to be served concurrently.

Notwithstanding § 71-6-102, for purposes of this section:

“Abuse, neglect, or exploitation” includes:

Abuse, neglect, and exploitation, as those terms are defined in § 71-6-102; and

Abuse, neglect, financial exploitation, and sexual exploitation, as those terms are defined in § 39-15-501; and

“Adult” means an adult as defined in § 71-6-102 or an elderly adult or vulnerable adult as those terms are defined in § 39-15-501.

Acts 2010, ch. 898, § 2; 2011, ch. 39, § 4; 2011, ch. 158, § 42; 2017, ch. 466, § 7; 2018, ch. 1050, §§ 10, 11; 2019, ch. 474, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 466, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Elderly and Vulnerable Adult Protection Act.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1050, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Elderly and Vulnerable Adult Protection Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1050, § 17 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to acts committed on or after January 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 474, 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Elderly and Vulnerable Adult Protection Act of 2019.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, effective January 1, 2020, rewrote the section which read: “(a)(1)(A) Any relative having personal knowledge that an adult has been the subject of a violation of §39-15-502, §39-15-507, §39-15-508, or §71-6-117 or that such adult is threatened with or placed in fear of a violation of §39-15-502, §39-15-507, §39-15-508, or §71-6-117 occurring against such adult may seek relief for the adult pursuant to this section by filing a sworn petition with any court with jurisdiction under this part alleging that the respondent has violated or threatens to violate § 39-15-502, § 39-15-507, § 39-15-508, or § 71-6-117, regardless of the existence of any other remedy at law.“(B) The petition must allege facts, based upon personal knowledge of the petitioner, that the adult lacks capacity to consent.“(C) Venue for a petition for an order of protection, and all other matters relating to orders of protection, shall be in the county where the respondent resides or the county in which the violation of § 39-15-502, § 39-15-507, § 39-15-508, or § 71-6-117 occurred or is threatened to occur. If the respondent is not a resident of this state, the petition may be filed in the county where the adult resides.“(2) The court may enter an immediate ex parte order of protection against the respondent if the petition alleges upon personal knowledge of the petitioner, and the court finds in its ex parte order, that the adult lacks capacity to consent and is in immediate danger of abuse, neglect or exploitation or that the adult's property is being, is in immediate danger of being, or has been misappropriated by the respondent.“(3) The petition and any ex parte order issued pursuant to this section shall be personally served upon the respondent and the adult. If the respondent is not a resident of this state, the ex parte order shall be served pursuant to §§20-2-215 and20-2-216.“(4) Written notice of the filing of the petition and copies of the petition and the ex parte order of protection against the respondent, if any, shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt to the adult protective services unit in the county office of department of human services in the county in which the petition is filed. The department shall have the right to intervene in the proceeding, but shall not otherwise be required to initiate any legal action as a result of such notice. The department may, at any time, file a petition pursuant to §71-6-107 if it determines that the adult who is the subject of a petition for an order of protection is in need of protective services.“(5)(A) Within fifteen (15) days of service of an ex parte order of protection against the respondent, a hearing shall be held, at which time the court shall either dissolve any ex parte order that has been issued, or shall, if the petitioner has proved the adult lacks capacity to consent and the allegation of abuse, neglect or exploitation or the threat of such by a preponderance of the evidence, extend the order of protection for a definite period of time, not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days, unless a further hearing on the continuation of such order is requested by the adult, the respondent or the petitioner; in which case, on proper showing of cause, such order may be continued for a further definite period of one hundred twenty (120) days.“(B) Any ex parte order of protection shall be in effect until the time of the hearing, and, if the hearing is held within fifteen (15) days of service of such order, the ex parte order shall continue in effect until the entry of any subsequent order of protection is issued, proceedings under title 34, chapters 1-3, are concluded, or the order of protection is dissolved. If no ex parte order of protection has been issued as of the time of the hearing, and the petitioner has proven that the adult lacks capacity to consent and the allegation of abuse, neglect or exploitation of the adult or the threat of such by a preponderance of the evidence, the court may, at that time, issue an order of protection for a definite period of time, not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days.“(C) The court shall cause a copy of the petition and notice of the date set for the hearing on such petition, as well as a copy of any ex parte order of protection, to be served upon the respondent and the adult at least five (5) days prior to such hearing. Such notice shall advise the respondent and the adult that each may be represented by counsel. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem under §34-1-107.“(D) Within the time the order of protection is in effect, any court with jurisdiction under this part may modify the order of protection, either upon the court's own motion or upon motion of the adult, the respondent or the petitioner.“(b) An order of protection granted pursuant to this section may:“(1)(A) Order the respondent to refrain from committing a violation of this part against an adult;“(B) Refrain from threatening to misappropriate or further misappropriating any moneys, state or federal benefits, retirement funds or any other personal or real property belonging to the adult; or“(C) Order the return to the adult or the adult's caretaker or conservator or other fiduciary any moneys, state or federal benefits, retirement funds or any other personal or real property belonging to the adult obtained by the respondent as result of exploitation of the adult or as result of any other misappropriation of such funds or property of the adult by the respondent. The court may enter judgment against the respondent for the repayment or return to the adult or the adult's caretaker, conservator or other fiduciary of any moneys, government benefits, retirement funds or any other personal or real property belonging to the adult that are under the control of or that have been obtained by the respondent as result of exploitation or misappropriation from the adult. Nothing in this subdivision (b)(1)(C) shall preclude an action under §71-6-120. The court may, if the amount in question exceeds ten thousand dollars ($10,000), require any caretaker or custodian of funds appointed under this section to post a bond as required by §34-1-105;“(2) Enjoin the respondent from providing care for an adult, on a temporary or permanent basis, anyone who the court finds has engaged in abuse, neglect or exploitation of an adult as defined in this part; in any situation involving the care of such adult, whether such actions occurred in an institutional setting, in any type of group home or foster care arrangement serving adults, and regardless of whether such person, facility or arrangement serving adults is licensed to provide care for adults;“(3) Prohibit the respondent from telephoning, contacting, or otherwise communicating with the adult, directly or indirectly; or“(4) Subject to the limitations otherwise stated in this section, grant any other relief deemed necessary by the court to protect an adult.“(c) All orders of protection shall be effective for a fixed period of time, not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days. The court may modify its order at any time upon subsequent motion filed by any party together with an affidavit showing a change in circumstances sufficient to warrant the modification. The petitioner, respondent or adult, or the court on its own motion shall commence a proceeding under title 34, chapters 1-3 to determine whether a fiduciary should be appointed, if any party alleges that the conditions giving rise to the order of protection continue or may continue beyond the one hundred twenty (120) days.“(d)(1) If the adult and the respondent have been served with a copy of the petition and notice of hearing, the order of protection shall be effective when the order is entered. For purposes of this subdivision (d)(1), an order shall be considered entered once a hearing is conducted and when such order is signed by:“(A) The judge and all parties or counsel;“(B) The judge and one (1) party or counsel and contains a certificate of counsel that a copy of the proposed order has been served on all other parties or counsel; or“(C) The judge and contains a certificate of the clerk that a copy has been served on all other parties or counsel.“(2) Service upon a party or counsel shall be made by delivering to such party or counsel a copy of the order of protection, or by the clerk mailing it to the party's last known address. In the event the party's last known address is unknown and cannot be ascertained upon diligent inquiry, the certificate of service shall so state. Service by mail is complete upon mailing.“(3) If the adult and the respondent have been served with a copy of the petition and notice of hearing, an order of protection issued pursuant to this part after a hearing shall be in full force and effect against the respondent from the time it is entered, regardless of whether the respondent is present at the hearing.“(4) A copy of any order of protection and any subsequent modifications or dismissal shall be issued to the petitioner, the respondent and the local law enforcement agencies having jurisdiction in the area where the adult resides. Upon receipt of the copy of the order of protection or dismissal from the issuing court or clerk's office, the local law enforcement agency shall take any necessary action to immediately transmit it to the national crime information center.“(5) Upon violation of an order of protection entered pursuant to this section, a court may order any appropriate punishment or relief as provided for in §36-3-610.“(e) (1) It is an offense to knowingly violate an order of protection issued pursuant to this section. A law enforcement officer may arrest a respondent who is the subject of an order of protection issued pursuant to this section with or without warrant.“(2) In order to constitute a violation of this section:“(A) The person must have received notice of the request for an order of protection;“(B) The person must have had an opportunity to appear and be heard in connection with the order of protection or restraining order; and“(C) The court must have made specific findings of fact in the order of protection that the person committed a violation of this part.“(3) Any law enforcement officer shall arrest the respondent without a warrant if:“(A) The officer has proper jurisdiction over the area in which the violation occurred;“(B) The officer has reasonable cause to believe the respondent has violated or is in violation of an order for protection; and“(C) The officer has verified that an order of protection is in effect against the respondent. If necessary, the law enforcement officer may verify the existence of an order of protection by telephone or radio communication with the appropriate law enforcement department.“(4) Any person arrested for a violation of an order of protection entered pursuant to this section shall be treated as a person arrested for a violation of an order of protection issued pursuant to title 36, chapter 3, part 6.“(5) A violation of this subsection (e) is a Class A misdemeanor, and any sentence imposed shall be served consecutively to the sentence for any other offense that is based in whole or in part on the same factual allegations, unless the sentencing judge or magistrate specifically orders the sentences for the offenses arising out of the same facts to be served concurrently.“(f) Notwithstanding §71-6-102, for purposes of this section:”(1) ‘Abuse, neglect, or exploitation’ includes:“(A) Abuse, neglect, and exploitation, as those terms are defined in §71-6-102; and“(B) Neglect and financial exploitation, as those terms are defined in §39-15-501; and“(2) ‘Adult’ means an elderly adult or vulnerable adult, as those terms are defined in §39-15-501.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 474, § 18. January 1, 2020; provided that for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 24, 2019.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

71-6-125. Vulnerable adult protective investigative team.

By January 1, 2017, the district attorney general of each judicial district shall establish, or cause to be established, a vulnerable adult protective investigative team (VAPIT) for the purpose of:

Coordinating the investigation of suspected instances of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of an adult; and

Receiving and reviewing information generated by the multi-disciplinary adult protective services evaluation teams as established in § 71-1-110.

As determined by the district attorney general, or the district attorney's designee, the VAPIT shall consist of representatives from within the judicial district, wherever appropriate, of:

The district attorney general, or the district attorney's designee;

Local law enforcement agencies;

The department's adult protective services section; and

Any other entity that the district attorney general, or the district attorney's designee, determines is necessary for the successful operation of the VAPIT.

Each VAPIT shall:

Meet regularly, as determined by the district attorney general, or the district attorney's designee; provided, that meetings shall be held at least quarterly; and

Conduct coordinated responses and investigations of instances of suspected abuse, neglect, or exploitation of adults.

By January 31 of the following year, each district attorney general shall cause to be filed an annual report that summarizes the work of the VAPIT for the previous calendar year with the chairs of the judiciary committee of the senate and the judiciary committee of the house of representatives.

Except as otherwise permitted by law, records, reports, and information concerning reports of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of an adult shall be kept confidential among the VAPIT's members.

Disclosure of the items in subdivision (e)(1) may be made to persons and entities directly involved in the administration of this section, including:

Attorneys, next friends, or other representatives of the adult client who are legally authorized to act in the adult client's interest;

Representatives of law enforcement;

Grand juries or courts in the exercise of official business;

Members of the VAPIT; and

Persons engaged in bona fide research or audit purposes; provided, that only information in the aggregate without identifying information may be provided for research or audit purposes and confidentiality of the data is maintained.

Unless necessary for the provision of medical, legal, housing, social welfare, or other services, the name of the potential or actual victim or client may only be shared outside of the VAPIT with representatives of law enforcement and organizations devoted to victims' services or advocacy.

If adequate resources are available, the VAPIT may maintain a database of information about past and ongoing cases; provided, that identifying information about individual victims and clients shall not be accessed by any person outside of the VAPIT.

Identifying information for the person who reports a case of suspected abuse, neglect, or exploitation of an adult shall be kept strictly confidential. The identifying information shall not be disclosed to any person or organization within or without the VAPIT, unless the reporting person expressly consents to disclosure.

Any person participating in good faith in any action or omission authorized or required under this section shall be immune from civil or criminal liability that may result by reason of such action or omission.

Any obligation or duty imposed upon a district attorney general by this section shall be contingent upon the availability of adequate resources.

Acts 2016, ch. 1006, § 1; 2019, ch. 345, § 145; 2019, ch. 474, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2019, ch. 474, 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Elderly and Vulnerable Adult Protection Act of 2019.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by ch. 345 substituted “judiciary” for “criminal justice” preceding “committee of the house” in (d).

The 2019 amendment by ch. 474, effective January 1, 2020, substituted “By December 1 of each year,” for “By January 31 of the following year,” at the beginning of (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2019, ch. 474, § 18. January 1, 2020; provided that for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 24, 2019.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.